Connecticut, session 2026, HB05281.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 8-28 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 Notice of all official actions or decisions of a planning commission,
4 not limited to those relating to the approval or denial of subdivision
5 plans, shall be published in a newspaper having a substantial circulation
6 in the municipality [within] not later than fifteen days after such action
7 or decision. Any appeal from an action or decision of a planning
8 commission shall be taken pursuant to the provisions of section 8-8.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 8-28
PD Joint Favorable
HB5281 / File No. 57 1

HB5281 File No. 57
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes a technical change that does not result in a fiscal
impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5281 / File No. 57 2

HB5281 File No. 57
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5281
AN ACT CONCERNING PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT.